California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) If the requirements of paragraph (1) are met, the State Department of State Hospitals may take the following actions:

(A) The State Department of State Hospitals may discontinue admissions for new patients committed to a state hospital pursuant to Section 5358.

(B) The State Department of State Hospitals may, following the determination by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services pursuant to paragraph (1), impose patient reduction targets over the next three fiscal years for patients committed to a state hospital pursuant to Section 5358. Reduction targets shall only be to the minimum level necessary to achieve timely access to treatment for IST commitments, as determined by the State Department of State Hospitals and the Secretary of California Health
 and Human Services and will allow no less than a minimum of six months for the first reduction target to be achieved.

(C) The State Department of State Hospitals may charge 150 percent of the daily bed rate for counties, pursuant to Section 4330, that exceed the bed usage for patients admitted pursuant to Section 5358 and that are above the specified patient reduction targets made pursuant to subparagraph (B). 

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of State Hospitals may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(h) Contracts awarded pursuant to this section, including contracts to implement solutions
 developed by the Incompetent to Stand Trial Solutions Workgroup, shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Section 4101.5, and the State Administrative Manual and shall not be subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 350.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4148.

(a) On or before January 31, 2026, the State Department of State Hospitals shall submit a report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review and the Assembly Committee on Budget providing amounts expended during the 2024–25 fiscal year, pursuant to Article 10.15 of the Bargaining Unit 16 Memorandum of Understanding between the State of California and the Union of American Physicians and Dentists, related to the following:

(1) The amount budgeted for civil service psychiatrists.

(2) The amount expended for civil
 service psychiatrists.

(3) The amount expended on civil service psychiatrists working additional caseload.

(4) The number of civil service psychiatrists who participated in working additional caseload.

(5) The amount expended on contract psychiatrists.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 231, Sec. 1.   (AB 310)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Boards of Trustees and Other Advisory Boards [4200. - 4203.]

4200.

(a) Each state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals shall have a hospital advisory board of eight members appointed by the Governor from a list of nominations submitted to him or her by the boards of supervisors of counties within each hospital’s designated service area. If a state hospital provides services for both persons with mental health disorders and persons with developmental disabilities, there shall be a separate advisory board for the program provided to persons with mental health disorders and a separate board for the program provided to persons with developmental disabilities. To the extent feasible, an advisory board serving a hospital for persons with mental health disorders shall consist of one member who has been a patient in a state hospital and two members shall be the
 parents, spouse, siblings, or adult children of persons who are or have been patients in a state hospital, three representatives of different professional disciplines selected from primary user counties for patients under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5, and two representatives of the general public who have demonstrated an interest in services to people with mental health disorders.

(b) Of the members first appointed after the operative date of the amendments made to this section during the 1975–76 legislative session, one shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one for three years. Thereafter, each appointment shall be for the term of three years, except that an appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term only. No person shall be appointed to serve more than a maximum of two terms as a member of the board.

(c) Notwithstanding any
 provision of this section, members serving on the hospital advisory board on the operative date of the amendments made to this section during the 1987–88 legislative session, may continue to serve on the board until the expiration of their term. The Legislature intends that changes in the composition of the board required by these amendments apply to future vacancies on the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 71.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to a hospital advisory board if he is a Member of the Legislature or an elective state officer, and if he becomes such after his appointment his office shall be vacated and a new appointment made. If any appointee fails to attend three consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless he is ill or absent from the state, his office becomes vacant, and the board, by resolution, shall so declare, and shall forthwith transmit a certified copy of such resolution to the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

The advisory boards of the several state hospitals are advisory to the State Department of State Hospitals and the Legislature with power of visitation and advice with respect to the conduct of the hospitals and coordination with community mental health programs. The members of the boards shall serve without compensation other than necessary expenses incurred in the performance of duty. They shall organize and elect a chairman. They shall meet at least once every three months and at such other times as they are called by the chairman, by the medical director, by the head of the department or a majority of the board. No expenses shall be allowed except in connection with meetings so held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 105.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.5.

(a) The chairman of a hospital advisory board advising a hospital for persons with mental health disorders shall meet annually with the hospital director, the community mental health directors, and the chairmen of the mental health advisory boards representing counties within the hospital’s designated service area.

(b) The chairmen shall be allowed necessary expenses incurred in attending these meetings.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department assist the development of annual regional meetings required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 72.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

The Atascadero State Hospital shall have an advisory board of seven persons appointed by the Governor, each of whom holds office for the term of three years. To the extent feasible the composition of board membership shall consist of two persons, who at the time of their appointment are relatives of the patient population, three representatives of professional disciplines serving the patient population, and two representatives of the general public. The board shall advise and consult with the department with respect to the conduct of the hospital. The members of the board shall serve without compensation other than necessary expenses incurred in attendance at meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1057.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Families of Persons With a Serious Mental Health Disorder [4240. - 4245.]

4240.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The symptoms and behaviors of persons with a serious mental health disorder may cause severe disruption of normal family relationships.

(b) Families are often the principal caregivers, housing providers, and case managers for family members with a serious
 mental health disorder.

(c) Families of persons with a serious mental health disorder more often than not have little or no legal authority over their adult family members with a mental health disorder who are sometimes difficult to manage. Consequently, they need advice, skills, emotional support, and guidance to cope with the
 stress of caregiving in order to be effective and helpful.

(d) Involved families are of inestimable value to the publicly funded and professionally operated state and county mental health system and programs emphasizing self-help can be the best way to assist families in maintaining the cohesion of family life while caring for and assisting a family member with a mental health disorder.

(e) Since the state’s mental health resources are limited and are increasingly being directed on a priority basis toward provision of services to persons with a serious mental health disorder, informed and active families helping one another can effectively extend and amplify the value of state mental health dollars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 8.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4241.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, by this chapter, to support an organized program of self-help in which families exchange information, advice, and emotional support to enable them to maintain and strengthen family life and secure or provide more effective treatment, care, and rehabilitation for family members with mental health disorders.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature to utilize an existing organized statewide network of families, who have family members with mental health disorders, as a means of delivering the services designated in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 74.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4242.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Family” means persons whose children, spouses, siblings, parents, grandparents, or grandchildren have a serious mental health disorder.

(b) “Serious mental health disorder” means a mental health disorder that is severe in degree and persistent in duration and that may cause a behavioral disorder or impair functioning so as to interfere substantially with activities of daily living. Serious mental
 health disorders include schizophrenia, major affective disorders, and other severely disabling mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 20.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4243.

(a) All funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be used to contract with an organization to establish a statewide network of families who have family members with mental health disorders for the purpose of providing information, advice, support, and other assistance to these families.

(b) A request for proposal shall be issued seeking applicants who are capable of supplying the services specified in Section 4244. The respondent organizations shall demonstrate that they:

(1) Focus their activities exclusively on persons with serious mental health disorders.

(2) Have experience in successfully working with state agencies,
 including, but not limited to, the State Department of State Hospitals.

(3) Have the ability to reach and involve the target population as active members.

(4) Have proven experience providing structured self-help services that benefit the target population.

(5) Have experience holding statewide and local conferences to educate families and professionals regarding the needs of persons with mental health disorders.

(6) Have the financial and organizational structure and experience to manage the funds provided under the proposed contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 75.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4244.

The Director of State Hospitals shall enter into a contract with the successful bidder to provide services that shall include, but not be necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(a) Production and statewide dissemination of information to families regarding methods of obtaining and evaluating services needed by family members with mental health disorders.

(b) Provision of timely advice, counseling, and other supportive services to assist families in coping with emotional stress and to enable them to care for or otherwise assist family members with mental disorders.

(c) Organizing family self-help services in local communities, accessible to families
 throughout the state.

(d) Conducting training programs for mental health practitioners and college and university students to inform current and future mental health professionals of the needs of families and methods of utilizing family resources to assist clients with mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 76.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4245.

Contracts entered in pursuant to this chapter shall:

(a) Have an annual contract period from July 1 through June 30 of each fiscal year unless the Director of State Hospitals or the contractor terminates the contract earlier.

(b) Require an annual report by the contractor accounting for all expenditures and program accomplishments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 108.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Officers and Employees [4300. - 4321.]

4300.

As used in this chapter, “officers” of a state hospital means:

(a) Medical director.

(b) Hospital administrator.

(c) Hospital director.

(d) Chief of police services at the hospital.

(e) Any other hospital employee appointed and deemed by the Director of
 State Hospitals to be an officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 39.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

(a) The Director of State Hospitals shall appoint and define the duties, subject to the laws governing civil service, of all of the following officers:

(1) A hospital administrator.

(2) A hospital director.

(3) A chief of police services.

(4) Any other hospital employee appointed
 and deemed by the Director of State Hospitals to be an officer.

(b) The Director of State Hospitals shall appoint a program director for each program at a state hospital.

(c) The Governor, upon the recommendation of the Director of State Hospitals, shall appoint one medical director for the department and one medical director for each state hospital. The medical director of the department shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in California and shall be responsible for standards, research, coordination, surveillance, and planning for the improvement of medical care for the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 40.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

The Director of State Hospitals shall have the final authority for determining all other employee needs after consideration of program requests from the various hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 110.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

Salaries of resident and other officers and wages of employees shall be included in the budget estimates of, and paid in the same manner as other expenses of, the state hospitals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

The primary purpose of a state hospital is the medical and nursing care of patients with mental health disorders. The efforts and direction of the officers and employees of each state hospital shall be directed to this end.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 77.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

(a) Subject to the rules and regulations established by the department, and under the supervision of the hospital director, the medical director of a state hospital shall be responsible for the planning, development, direction, management, supervision, and evaluation of medical care provided.

(b) A medical director of a state hospital shall be a physician who has passed, or shall pass, an examination for a license to practice medicine in California and shall be a qualified specialist in a branch of medicine that includes diseases affecting the brain and nervous system. The medical director of a state hospital shall be well qualified by training or experience to have proven skills in mental hospital program administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 41.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.

(a) Subject to the rules and regulations established by the department, under the supervision of the hospital director, the hospital administrator shall be responsible for the planning, development, direction, management and supervision of all administrative and supportive services in the hospital facility. These services include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) All administrative functions, such as personnel, accounting, budgeting, and patients’ accounts.

(2) All life-support functions, such as food services, facility maintenance and patient supplies.

(3) All other business functions.

 (b) It shall be the responsibility of the hospital administrator to provide support services, as specified in this section, within available resources, to all hospital treatment programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 42.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4307.

The hospital director is the chief executive officer of the hospital and is responsible for all hospital operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 43.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4308.

(a) If a vacancy occurs in a hospital under the jurisdiction of the Director of State Hospitals, the Director of State Hospitals shall appoint, as provided in Section 4301, a hospital administrator, a hospital director, and program directors.

(b) A hospital administrator shall be selected based on their overall knowledge of the hospital and the operation of its administrative, business, and life-support functions and shall have had experience in this area.

(c) The hospital director shall be selected based on their overall knowledge of the hospital, its programs, and its relationship to its community, and on their demonstrated abilities to administer a large facility.

(d) The standards for the professional qualifications of a program director shall be established by the Director of State Hospitals for each patient program. The Director of State Hospitals shall not adopt regulations that prohibit a licensed psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric technician, or clinical social worker from employment in a patient program in any professional, administrative, or technical position. However, the program director of a medical-surgical unit shall be a licensed physician.

(e) If the program director is not a physician, a physician shall be available to assume responsibility for all those acts of diagnosis, treatment, or prescribing or ordering of drugs that may only be performed by a licensed physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 44.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4309.

The hospital director is responsible for the overall management of the hospital. In the hospital director’s absence, one of the other hospital officers, or in the absence of the other hospital officers, a program director, or other hospital representative shall be designated to perform the hospital director’s duties and assume the hospital director’s responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 45.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4311.

(a) The chief of police services at the hospital shall be responsible for preserving the peace in the hospital buildings and grounds and may arrest or cause the arrest and appearance before the nearest magistrate for examination, of all persons who attempt to commit or have committed a public offense thereon.

(b) The chief of police services shall be an experienced law enforcement officer who has completed the management training course prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, with management experience directing uniformed peace officers and investigation officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 9.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4312.

The hospital director may establish rules and regulations not inconsistent with law or departmental regulations, concerning the care and treatment of patients, research, clinical training, and for the government of the hospital buildings and grounds. Any person who knowingly or willfully violates such rules and regulations may, upon the order of either of the hospital officers, be ejected from the buildings and premises of the hospital.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

4313.

The chief of police services, supervising investigators, investigators, and each hospital police officer have the powers and authority conferred by law upon each respectively as set forth in subdivision (v) of Section 830.3 and Section 830.38 of the Penal Code. When and as directed by the hospital director, the chief of police
 services, supervising investigators, investigators, and hospital police officers shall enforce the rules and regulations of the hospital, preserve peace and order on the premises thereof, protect and preserve the property of the state, and help ensure integration of treatment, safety, and security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 10.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4313.5.

(a) Designated investigators of state hospitals shall request a sexual assault forensic medical examination for any resident of a state hospital who is a victim or reasonably suspected to be a victim of sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63, performed at an appropriate facility off the grounds of a state hospital in accordance with Sections 13823.5 to 13823.12, inclusive, of the Penal Code, which includes, but is not limited to, the requirement that the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or county in which the state hospital is located be notified by the person performing the sexual assault forensic medical examination and that consent is obtained as required by subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 13823.11 of the Penal Code.

(b) The sexual assault forensic medical examination described in subdivision (a) may be performed at a state hospital by an independent sexual assault forensic examiner designated to perform examinations of victims of sexual assault in the jurisdiction of the state hospital only if it is deemed safer for the victim and the state hospital’s examination facilities are equipped with forensic examination and evidence collection capability comparable to that of the designated community examination facility, as determined by the independent sexual assault forensic examiner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   (SB 651)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4314.

(a) The Director of State Hospitals may set aside and designate any space on the grounds of any of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the department that is not needed for other authorized purposes, to enable the institution to establish and maintain therein a store or canteen for the sale to or for the benefit of patients of the institution of candies, sundries, and other articles. The stores shall be conducted subject to the rules and regulations of the department and the rental, utility, and service charges shall be fixed as will reimburse the institutions for the cost thereof. The stores when conducted under the direction of a hospital administrator shall be operated on a nonprofit basis but any profits derived shall be deposited in the benefit fund of each institution as set forth in Section 4125.

 (b) Before any store is authorized or established, the Director of State Hospitals shall first determine that the facilities are not being furnished adequately by private enterprise in the community where it is
 proposed to locate the store, and may hold public hearings or cause surveys to be made, to determine the same.

 (c) The Director of State Hospitals may rent space to private individuals, for the maintenance of a store or canteen at any of these institutions upon any terms and subject to any regulations that are approved by the Department of General Services, in accordance with the provisions of Section 13109 of the Government Code. The terms imposed shall provide that the rental, utility, and service charges to be paid shall be fixed so as to reimburse the institution for the cost thereof and any additional charges required to be paid shall be deposited in the benefit fund of the institution as set forth in Section
 4125.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 46.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4316.

(a) Subject to rules and regulations adopted by the department, the hospital director may establish a sheltered workshop at a state hospital to provide patients with remunerative work performed in a setting which simulates that of industry and is performed in such a manner as to meet standards of industrial quality. The workshop shall be so operated as to provide the treatment staff with a realistic atmosphere for assessing patients’ capabilities in work settings, and to provide opportunities to strengthen and expand patient interests and aptitudes.

(b) Notwithstanding any payment schedule approved by the department, state hospital patients who participate in sheltered workshops established under this section are not
 “employees” within the meaning of Sections 18526 and 18529 of the Government Code and Sections 1182.12, 1191.5, and 2750 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 43.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4317.

At each state hospital at which there is established a sheltered workshop, there shall be a sheltered workshop fund administered by the clinical director. The fund shall be used for the purchase of materials, for the purchase or rental of equipment needed in the manufacturing, fabricating, or assembly of products, for the payment of remuneration to patients engaged in work at the workshop, and for the payment of such other costs of the operation of the workshop as may be directed by the medical director. The clinical director may cause the raw materials, goods in process, finished products, and equipment necessary for the production thereof to be insured against any and all risks of loss, subject to the approval of the Department of General Services. The costs of such insurance shall be paid from the sheltered workshop fund.

All money received from the manufacture, fabrication, assembly, or distribution of products at any state hospital sheltered workshop shall be deposited and credited to the hospital’s sheltered workshop fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

4317.5.

The hospital director, subject to rules and regulations adopted by the department, may in addition to establishing a sheltered workshop, provide other vocational rehabilitation programs for state hospital patients. Notwithstanding any payment schedule approved by the department, state hospital patients who participate in a vocational rehabilitation program established under this section are not “employees” within the meaning of Sections 18526 and 18529 of the Government Code and Sections 1182.12, 1191.5, and 2750 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 44.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4318.

Each state hospital shall, prior to the discharge of any patient who was placed in the facility under a county Short-Doyle plan, prepare a written recommended aftercare plan which shall be transmitted to the local director of mental health services in the county of the patient’s placement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such aftercare plan shall specify the following:

(a) Diagnoses;

(b) Treatment initiated;

(c) Medications and their dosage schedules;

(d) Date of discharge;

(e) Location of community placement;

(f) Plan for continuing treatment; and

(g) List of referrals indicated, including, but not limited to:

(1) Public social services.

(2) Legal aid.

(3) Educational services.

(4) Vocational services.

(5) Medical treatment other than mental health services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

4319.

To ensure a continuous level of competency for all state hospital treatment personnel under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals, the department shall provide adequate in-service training programs for such state hospital treatment personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 111.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4320.

To ensure an adequate supply of licensed psychiatric technicians for state hospitals, the State Department of State Hospitals, to the extent necessary, shall establish in state hospitals a course of study and training equivalent, as determined by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, to the minimum requirements of an accredited program for psychiatric technicians in the state. No unlicensed psychiatric technician trainee shall be permitted to perform the duties of a licensed psychiatric technician as provided by Section 4502 of the Business and Professions Code unless the trainee performs the duties pursuant to a plan of supervision approved by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California as part of the equivalency trainee program. This section shall not be
 construed to reduce the effort presently expended by the community college system or private colleges in training psychiatric technicians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 79.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4321.

(a) (1) The criminal history check authorized by this section is limited to an employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, and volunteer whose duties include, or would include, access to any of the following:

(A) A State Department of State Hospitals facility.

(B) State Department of State Hospitals patients or clients.

(C) Individuals who are being evaluated for commitment to the State Department of State Hospitals.

(D) Medical Information, as defined by
 Section 56.05 of the Civil Code.

(E) Criminal offender record information, as defined in Section 11075 of the Penal Code, including federal criminal history information obtained pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of an employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, and volunteer, specified in subdivision (a), in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of
 the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 21.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. County Use of State Hospitals [4330. - 4336.]

4330.

The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall be reimbursed for use of state hospital beds by counties pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 as follows:

(a) (1) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, the department shall receive reimbursement in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17601. This total may be adjusted to reflect any and all amounts previously unallocated or held in reserve for use by small counties and any adjustments made pursuant to Chapter 1341 of the Statutes of 1990.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage and
 allow greater flexibility with respect to resources during the first transitional year, and, to this end, the Director of Mental Health, or his or her successor, the Director of State Hospitals, may implement proposals for purchase in or purchase out of, state hospital beds which were proposed in accordance with Chapter 1341 of the Statutes of 1990.

(3) Funds and bed days historically allocated to small counties shall be allocated to counties with no allocation.

(b) Each fiscal year, the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall be reimbursed in accordance with the contracts entered into pursuant to Section 4331.

(c) The rate of reimbursement which shall apply each fiscal year shall be determined by the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the
 State Department of State Hospitals, and shall include all actual costs determined by hospital and by type of service provided. Any costs resulting from overexpenditure in the previous year shall be clearly separated from actual costs projected for the contract year and identified as a part of the rate negotiation. Costs shall not include costs incurred for capital outlay relating to existing facilities or capacity, which shall remain the responsibility of the state. Costs for capital outlay related to future expansions or construction of new facilities requested by any county or cost related to innovative arrangements under Section 4355 shall be a cost to the county unless the expansion, construction or innovative arrangements are determined to be of statewide benefit. Pursuant to Section 11343 of the Government Code, the rate of reimbursement shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) After final determination of state hospital costs for patients covered under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5, funds that remain unencumbered at the close of the fiscal year shall be made available to counties that used fewer state hospital beds than their contracted number, proportional to the contracted amount not used, but this amount shall not exceed the value of the unused contracted amount. These funds shall be used for mental health purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 113.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4331.

(a) No later than July 1, 1992, and in each subsequent year, each county acting singly or in combination with other counties shall contract with the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, for the number and types of state hospital beds that the department will make available to the county or counties during the fiscal year. Each county contract shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, as well as other applicable provisions of law, but shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Administrative Manual, or the Public Contract Code and shall not be subject to review and approval by the Department
 of General Services.

(b) (1) No later than January 1, 1992, each county acting singly or in combination with other counties, shall notify the State Department of Mental Health in writing as to the number and type of state hospital beds the county or counties will contract for with the state in the 1992–93 fiscal year.

(2) No later than July 1, 1992, and no later than July 1 of each subsequent year, each county acting singly or in combination with other counties shall give the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, preliminary written notification of the number and types of state hospital beds that the county or counties will contract for with the state during the subsequent fiscal year. Counties may include in their notification a request for additional beds beyond their previous year’s contract.

(3) No later than January 1, 1993, and no later than January 1 of each subsequent year, each county acting singly or in combination with other counties shall give the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, final written notifications of the number and types of state hospital beds that the county or counties will contract for with the state during the subsequent fiscal year. These notifications shall not preclude subsequent changes agreed to by both the state and the county in the contract negotiation process.

(4) The State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall provide counties with preliminary cost and utilization information based on the best data possible, 60 days in advance of the preliminary notification deadline, and a proposed final cost estimate, based on the best
 data possible, 60 days in advance of the final deadline. Final rates shall be subject to contract agreement.

(c) There shall be no increase in the number of beds provided to a county or group of counties during a fiscal year unless the contract between the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, and that county or group of counties is amended by mutual agreement. Any significant change in services requested by a county shall require amendment of the contract.

(d) If a county or group of counties has not contracted with the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, by July 1 of any given year, the number of beds to be provided that fiscal year shall be the same as the number provided the previous fiscal year, unless the department and a county have formally agreed otherwise,